Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-13] Qualifying patients and primary
caregivers; dispensing limits; other states. (a) A qualifying patient or
a primary caregiver on behalf of a qualifying patient shall be allowed to
purchase no more than four ounces of marijuana within a consecutive period of
fifteen days, or no more than eight ounces of marijuana within a consecutive
period of thirty days.

(b) A qualifying patient or a primary
caregiver on behalf of a qualifying patient may purchase marijuana from any
dispensary location in the State, subject to the limits set forth in subsection
(a).

(c) Beginning on January 1, 2018, this section
may apply to qualifying patients from other states, territories of the United
States, or the District of Columbia; provided that the patient is verified as a
patient in their home state and registers with the department through a
registration process established by the department. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next